District of Columbia statutes.
42-1232

Validity of electronic documents and digitized images.

(a)

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be an original, be on paper or other tangible medium, or be in writing, an electronic document or digitized image that satisfies this chapter satisfies the law.

(b)

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be signed, an electronic signature or digitized image of a wet signature on a paper document satisfies the law.

(c)

A requirement that a document or a signature associated with a document be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed, or made under oath is satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized to perform that act, and all other information required to be included, is attached to or logically associated with the document or signature. A physical or electronic image of a stamp, impression, or seal is not required to accompany an electronic signature.

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-25, § 3, 52 DCR 8084
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act.